North Dakota, session 69, SB2027.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 11-11 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Floodplain management ordinances - Requirements - Limitations - Definitions -
Enforcement.
1. As used in this chapter:
a. "Floodplain management" has the same meaning as in section 61 - 16.2 - 02 .
b. "Floodplain management ordinance" has the same meaning as in section 61 - 16.2 - 02 .
c. "Indian country" means all:
(1) Land within the limits of any Indian reservation that is under the jurisdiction of the
United States government and located within this state, notwithstanding the
issuance of any patent, and, including rights of way running through the reservation;
(2) Dependent Indian communities within this state whether within the original or
subsequently acquired territory of the state; and
(3) Indian allotments within this state, the Indian titles to which have not been
extinguished, including rights of way running through the allotted lands.
2. A board of county commissioners may undertake floodplain management as provided in
chapter 61 - 16.2. If a board of county commissioners undertakes floodplain managemen t
under this section, the board of county commissioners shall enact a floodplain management
ordinance applying to all persons and property within the boundaries of the county, except for
persons and property within a city's zoning jurisdiction as provided under chapter 40 - 47 or
within the exterior boundaries of Indian country.
3. Notwithstanding subsection 2, if a board of township supervisors approves by a written
resolution that the township desires to undertake floodplain management under chapter
61 - 16.2, the board of township supervisors shall avail itself the authority to regulate floodplain
management. Upon the adoption of the resolution, the board of township supervisors has
exclusive authority to regulate floodplain management under chapter 61 - 16.2. If a board o f
township supervisors undertakes floodplain management under this section, the board of
township supervisors shall enact a floodplain management ordinance applying to all persons
and property within the boundaries of the township, except for persons and property within a

S. B. NO. 2027 - PAGE 2
city's zoning jurisdiction as provided under chapter 40 - 47 or within the exterior boundaries o f
Indian country. The township clerk shall forward a copy of the written resolution to the county
auditor of the county in which the township is located and the department of water resources
for inclusion in the central repository established under section 10 of this Act .
4. After acquiring floodplain management authority from the county under subsection 3, the
township may relinquish its floodplain management authority back to the county upon
execution of a written agreement signed by the board of county commissioners and the board
of township supervisors. The county may not require the township to convey an additional
authority legally afforded to the township in exchange for the written agreement. The
relinquishment of authority may not become effective sooner than sixty days after the board of
township supervisors delivers a written notice of proposed relinquishment to the appropriate
board of county commissioners.
5. If a township previously exercised floodplain management authority and becomes subject to
county floodplain management authority under this section, the township shall defend,
indemnify, and hold harmless the county and its agents, officers, and employees from and
against a claim for damages arising from a township's noncompliance with chapter 61 - 16.2
and the national flood insurance program [42 U.S.C. 4001 et seq.] .
6. Upon enactment of a floodplain management ordinance by a county under this section, the
county auditor shall forward the ordinance to the department of water resources for inclusion
in the central repository established under section 10 of this Act .
7. The county auditor of a county exercising floodplain management authority shall certify to the
department of water resources by March thirty-first of each year a list of the jurisdictions over
which the county is exercising floodplain management authority under chapter 61 - 16.2 .
8. A county exercising floodplain management authority is not required to activate its zoning
authority under chapter 11 - 33 before enacting a floodplain management ordinance .
9. In a county exercising floodplain management, the board of county commissioners shall
enforce an ordinance or regulation enacted under this section. The board of county
commissioners may impose enforcement duties on an officer, department, agency, or
employee of the county.
SECTION 2. A new subsection to section 11-11-14 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
To undertake floodplain management activities in the manner provided under section 1 of this
Act.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 11-33-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
2. To provide for emergency management, including floodplain management as provided under
section 1 of this Ac t. "Emergency management" means a comprehensive integrated system at
all levels of government and in the private sector which provides for the development and
maintenance of an effective capability to mitigate, prepare for, respond to, and recover from
known and unforeseen hazards or situations, caused by an act of nature or man, which may
threaten, injure, damage, or destroy lives, property, or our environment.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Subsection 67 of section 40-05-01 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
67. Flood control projects , including floodplain management as provided under section 5 of this
Act. To acquire, construct, maintain, operate, finance, and control flood control projects, both
within and adjacent to such municipality, and for such purpose to acquire the necessary real

S. B. NO. 2027 - PAGE 3
property and easements therefor by purchase and eminent domain, in accordance with
chapter 32-15, and to adopt such ordinances as may reasonably be required to regulate the
same.
SECTION 5. A new section to chapter 40-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Floodplain management ordinances - Requirements - Limitations - Definitions -
Enforcement.
1. As used in this chapter:
a. "Floodplain management" has the same meaning as in section 61 - 16.2 - 02 .
b. "Floodplain management ordinance" has the same meaning as in section 61 - 16.2 - 02 .
c. "Indian country" means:
(1) Land within the limits of any Indian reservation that is under the jurisdiction of the
United States government and located within this state, notwithstanding the
issuance of any patent, and, including rights of way running through the reservation;
(2) Dependent Indian communities within this state whether within the original or
subsequently acquired territory of the state; and
(3) Indian allotments within this state, the Indian titles to which have not been
extinguished, including rights of way running through the allotted land.
2. The governing body of a city may exercise floodplain management authority under chapter
61 - 16.2. If a governing body of a city undertakes floodplain management, the governing body
of a city shall enact a floodplain management ordinance over all persons and property within
the boundaries of the city's zoning jurisdiction as provided under chapter 40 - 47 or within the
exterior boundaries of Indian country.
3. Upon enactment of a floodplain management ordinance by a city under this section, the city
auditor shall forward the ordinance to the department of water resources for inclusion in the
central repository established under section 10 of this Act .
4. The city auditor of a city exercising floodplain management authority shall certify to the
department of water resources by March thirty-first of each year that the city is undertaking
floodplain management activities under chapter 61 - 16.2 .
5. A city exercising floodplain management authority is not required to activate its zoning
authority under chapter 40 - 47 before enacting a floodplain management ordinance .
6. In a city exercising floodplain management, the governing body of the city shall enforce an
ordinance or regulation enacted under this section. The governing body of the city may
impose enforcement duties on an officer, department, agency, or employee of the city.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 40-47-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
2. Provide for emergency management, including floodplain management as provided under
section 5 of this Ac t. "Emergency management" means a comprehensive integrated system at
all levels of government and in the private sector which provides for the development and
maintenance of an effective capability to mitigate, prepare for, respond to, and recover from
known and unforeseen hazards or situations, caused by an act of nature or man, which may
threaten, injure, damage, or destroy lives, property, or our environment;

S. B. NO. 2027 - PAGE 4
SECTION 7. AMENDMENT. Section 58-03-12 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
58-03-12. Basis for township zoning regulations and restrictions.
1. The regulations and restrictions established in any township zoning district must be made in
accordance with a comprehensive plan with reasonable consideration as to the character of
such district, its peculiar suitability for particular uses, the normal growth of the municipality,
and the various types of occupations, industries, and land uses within the area, and must be
designed to facilitate traffic movement, encourage orderly growth and development of the
municipality and adjacent areas, promote health, safety, and general welfare, and provide for
emergency management, including and subject to floodplain management as provided under
section 8 of this Ac t.
2. "Emergency management" means a comprehensive integrated system at all levels of
government and in the private sector which provides for the development and maintenance of
an effective capability to mitigate, prepare for, respond to, and recover from known and
unforeseen hazards or situations, caused by an act of nature or man, which may threaten,
injure, damage, or destroy lives, property, or our environment. The comprehensive plan must
be a statement in documented text setting forth explicit goals, objectives, policies, and
standards of the jurisdiction to guide public and private development within its control.
SECTION 8. A new section to chapter 58-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Floodplain management ordinances - Requirements - Limitations - Definitions -
Enforcement.
1. As used in this chapter:
a. "Floodplain management" has the same meaning as in section 61 - 16.2 - 02 .
b. "Floodplain management ordinance" has the same meaning as in section 61 - 16.2 - 02 .
c. "Indian country" means:
(1) Land within the limits of any Indian reservation that is under the jurisdiction of the
United States government and located within this state, notwithstanding the
issuance of any patent, and, including rights of way running through the reservation;
(2) Dependent Indian communities within this state whether within the original or
subsequently acquired territory of the state; and
(3) Indian allotments within this state, the Indian titles to which have not been
extinguished, including rights of way running through the allotted land.
2. A board of township supervisors by written resolution may exercise floodplain management
under chapter 61 - 16.2. Upon the adoption of the resolution, the board of township supervisors
has exclusive authority to regulate floodplain management and shall enact a floodplain
management ordinance applying to all persons and property within the boundaries of the
township, except for persons and property within a city's zoning jurisdiction as provided under
chapter 40 - 47 or within the exterior boundaries of Indian country. The township clerk shal l
forward a copy of the written resolution to the county auditor of the county where the township
is located and the department of water resources for inclusion in the central repository
established under section 10 of this Act .
3. A township not exercising its floodplain management authority under this section is subject to
the floodplain management authority of the county under section 1 of this Act .

S. B. NO. 2027 - PAGE 5
4. After acquiring floodplain management authority from the county under subsection 2, the
township may relinquish its floodplain management authority back to the county upon
execution of a written agreement signed by the board of county commissioners and the board
of township supervisors. The county may not require the township to convey an additional
authority legally afforded to the township in exchange for the written agreement. The
relinquishment of authority may not become effective sooner than sixty days after the board of
township supervisors delivers a written notice of proposed relinquishment to the appropriate
board of county commissioners.
5. If a township previously exercised floodplain management authority and becomes subject to
county floodplain management authority under this section, the township shall defend,
indemnify, and hold harmless the county and its agents, officers, and employees from and
against a claim for damages arising from a township's noncompliance with chapter 61 - 16.2
and the national flood insurance program [42 U.S.C. 4001 et seq.] .
6. Upon enactment of a floodplain management ordinance by a township under this section, the
township clerk shall forward the ordinance to the department of water resources for inclusion
in the central repository established under section 10 of this Act .
7. The township clerk of a township exercising floodplain management authority shall certify to
the department of water resources by April thirtieth of each year the names of the township
supervisors and officers and that the township is undertaking floodplain management activities
under chapter 61 - 16.2 .
8. A township exercising floodplain management authority is not required to activate its zoning
authority under chapter 58 - 03 before enacting a floodplain management ordinance .
9. In a township exercising floodplain management, the board of township supervisors shall
enforce an ordinance or regulation enacted under this section. The board of township
supervisors may impose enforcement duties on an officer, department, agency, or employee
of the township.
SECTION 9. A new subsection to section 58-06-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
If the township activates its floodplain management authority under section 8 of this Act, to
exercise floodplain management authority by enacting a floodplain management ordinance.
SECTION 10. A new section to chapter 61-16.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Central repository - Floodplain management authority - Accessible to the public .
The department shall establish, operate, and maintain a publicly accessible electronic central
repository for local floodplain management ordinances, local floodplain management agreements, and
all annual certifications received by the department. The repository must reflect which cities, townships,
and counties have reported undertaking floodplain management within the state. The department shall
update the central repository by May thirty - first of each year .
SECTION 11. AMENDMENT. Section 61-16.2-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
61-16.2-02. Definitions.
1. In this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise provides:
a. "Commission" means state water commission.
b. "Community" means any political subdivision that has the authority to zone.

S. B. NO. 2027 - PAGE 6
c. "Conveyance" or "hydraulic conveyance" means a geometric characteristic of a river or
watercourse at a given point that determines the flow-carrying capacity at that point.
d. "Department" means the department of water resources.
e. "District" means a water resource district, as defined in chapter 61-16.1.
f. "Flood fringe" means that portion of a floodplain outside of the floodway.
g. "Floodplain management" means a community - based effort to prevent or reduce the risk
of flooding. Floodplain management may be associated generally with the national flood
insurance program [42 U.S.C. 4001 et seq.].
h. "Floodplain management ordinance" means a building code, zoning, subdivision, health,
or special purpose ordinance, and any other use of police power, which provide
standards for communities to manage known flood hazards in all official actions relating
to land management and use. A floodplain management ordinance may be associated
with the national flood insurance program [42 U.S.C. 4001 et seq.] to ensure participating
communities meet state and federal minimum standards.
i. "Floodway" or "regulatory floodway" means the channel of a river or other watercourse
and the adjacent land areas that must be reserved in order to discharge the base flood
without cumulatively increasing the water surface elevation more than one foot
[30.48 centimeters].
h.j. "Person" means any person, firm, partnership, association, corporation, limited liability
company, agency, or any other private or governmental organization, which includes any
agency of the United States, a state agency, or any political subdivision of the state.
2. For the purposes of this chapter, the department shall follow the definitions in this section and
the definitions under the national flood insurance program [42 U.S.C. 4001 et seq.] and
implementing regulations.

S. B. NO. 2027 - PAGE 7
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2027.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 83 Nays 9 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State